District of Columbia statutes.
31-5727

Repealed

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities — Existing contracts preserved; Congressional powers reserved.

Repealed.

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 160, ch. 135, § 6
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1227.
1973 Ed., § 35-927.